Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Chapter 33.1. Dairy Producer Margin Coverage Premium Assistance Program.

[Expires July 1, 2023]

§ 3.2-3304.
(Expires July 1, 2023) Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“DCR”
means the Department of Conservation and Recreation.

“Farm Act”
means the federal Agriculture Improvement Act of 2018, P.L. 115-334.

“Federal coverage program”
means the federal margin coverage program for dairy producers as contained in the Farm Act.

“Program”
means the Dairy Producer Margin Coverage Premium Assistance Program created pursuant to this chapter.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 330, 331.

Cross references.

As to July 1, 2023, sunset date for this Chapter, see §

3.2-3307

.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021.

§ 3.2-3305.
(Expires July 1, 2023) Dairy Producer Margin Coverage Premium Assistance Program.

The Commissioner shall establish and administer the Dairy Producer Margin Coverage Premium Assistance Program to assist dairy producers that participate in the federal coverage program.

Any dairy producer in the Commonwealth that participates in the federal coverage program at the first tier coverage level and (i) has a resource management plan and has been certified as having implemented such plan by, or is in the process of having such plan reviewed by, DCR or a local soil and water conservation district, (ii) has an approved Natural Resource Conservation Service nutrient management or soil health plan developed by an approved planner, or (iii) has a nutrient management plan that has been approved by, or is currently being reviewed by, DCR shall be eligible to apply to participate in the Program. An eligible dairy producer shall apply to the Department by May 15 of each year to participate.

Any participating dairy producer that has paid an annual federal premium payment at the tier I level in accordance with the Farm Act and provides proof of such payment to the Department shall have the amount of such premium reimbursed by the Department. Such reimbursement shall be provided on a first-come, first-served basis and shall be subject to availability of funds expressly appropriated for the purposes set forth in this chapter.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 330, 331; 2022, c. 1.

Cross references.

As to July 1, 2023, sunset date for this Chapter, see §

3.2-3307

.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 1, effective February 14, 2022, in subsection B, inserted clause (ii) in the first sentence and substituted “May 15” for “February 1” in the last sentence.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021.

§ 3.2-3306.
(Expires July 1, 2023) Report.

The Commissioner shall submit an annual report no later than December 1 of each year to the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources and the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources assessing the effectiveness of the Program in preserving and assisting with the continued operation of dairy producers in the Commonwealth.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 330, 331.

Cross references.

As to July 1, 2023, sunset date for this Chapter, see §

3.2-3307

.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021.

§ 3.2-3307.
(Expires July 1, 2023) Expiration of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter shall expire on July 1, 2023.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 330, 331.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021.